Massachusetts, session 194th, S2455.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 67 of Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
the following words, in paragraph (G), after the word “achievement medal” every time it
appears, by inserting the following:- “commemorative pin for Armed Services members who
have dedicated their services to the Commonwealth of Massachusetts”
And further, by adding the following new section:
SECTION XX. The Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall create a commemorative pin
that acknowledges the dual sacrifices of our firefighters, Police, Emergency Medical Technicians
and Emergency Medical service volunteers who served in the Armed Forces of the United States
shall be approved by the art commission for the Commonwealth.
of 2

SECTION 2. The Massachusetts Legislature shall pay the cost of producing the
commemorative pins subject to adequate appropriations in the FY2025 operating budget.
of 2